Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF483.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2802XS (2) 91 th/ns S.F. 483 Section 1. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION ââ BIODEGRADABLE 1 DEICERS ââ STUDY AND REPORT. 2 1. The department of transportation shall study the use 3 of biodegradable deicers, including beet juice, to treat 4 and control the accumulation of ice and snow on highways. 5 The department shall evaluate the environmental impact, 6 practicality, and associated costs of using biodegradable 7 deicers, including beet juice. 8 2. The department shall submit a report with its findings to 9 the general assembly by January 1, 2027. 10